pt-BR: Mountainboard tipo de truck: Channel; Kingpin duplo (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Mola; Outros
fr: Type d’essieu du mountainboard: Profilé en U; Double pivot (DKP); Matrix; Skate; À ressorts; Autre
zh-CN: 山地板支架类型: 通道式; 双主销 (DKP); 矩阵式; 滑板式; 弹簧式; 其他
en: Mountainboard truck type: Channel; Double kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Spring; Other
lt-LT: Mountainboard važiuoklės tipas: Kanalinis; Dvigubos ašies (DKP); Matricos; Riedlentės; Spyruoklinis; Kita
fi: Mountainboard-trukin tyyppi: Kanava; Kaksoispultti (DKP); Matrix; Skeitti; Jousi; Muu
vi: Loại trục ván trượt núi: Channel; Trục kép (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Lò xo; Khác
zh-TW: 山地滑板橋架類型: Channel; 雙主釘 (DKP); Matrix; 滑板; 彈簧; 其他
cs: Typ trucku Mountainboard: Kanálové (channel); S dvojitým kingpinem (DKP); Matrix; Skateboardové; Pružinové; Jiné
es: Tipo de eje de mountainboard: Canal; Doble kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Resorte; Otro
ru: Тип подвески маунтинборда: Канальные; С двойным кингпином (DKP); Matrix; Скейтовые; Пружинные; Другое
de: Typ der Mountainboard-Achsen: Channel; Double Kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Feder; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta podvozja za mountainboard: Channel; Dvojni kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Vzmetno; Drugo
el: Τύπος άξονα Mountainboard: Κανάλι; Διπλό kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Ελατήριο; Άλλο
sv: Typ av mountainboard-truck: Kanal; Dubbel kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Fjäder; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ truckov pre mountainboard: Channel; Dvojitý kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Pružinové; Iné
ko: 마운틴보드 트럭 유형: 채널; 더블 킹핀(DKP); 매트릭스; 스케이트; 스프링; 기타
pt-PT: tipo de camião Mountainboard: Canal; Pivô duplo (DKP); Matriz; Skate; Mola; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de axe pentru mountainboard: Canal; Pivot dublu (DKP); Matrice; Skate; Arc; Altele
it: Tipo di truck del mountainboard: A canale; Doppio kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; A molla; Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta kamiona za mountainboard: Channel; Double kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Opruga; Ostalo
th: ทรัคบอร์ดแบบ Mountainboard: แชนเนล; ดับเบิลคิงพิน (DKP); แมทริกซ์; สเก็ต; สปริง; อื่นๆ
nl: Mountainboard truck type: Kanaal; Dubbele kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Veer; Overig
da: Type af mountainboard-aksel: Kanal; Dobbelt kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Fjeder; Andet
bg-BG: Тип тракове за маунтинборд: Channel; Двоен кингпин (DKP); Matrix; Скейт; Пружинен; Друго
hu: Mountainboard felfüggesztésének típusa: Csatornás (Channel); Dupla csapszeges (DKP); Matrix; Gördeszka (Skate); Rugós; Egyéb
pl: Typ ciężarówki Mountainboard: Channel; Double kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Sprężynowe; Inne
ja: マウンテンボードトラックタイプ: チャネル; ダブルキングピン (DKP); マトリックス; スケート; スプリング; その他
nb: Type truck for mountainboard: Channel; Dobbelt kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Skate; Fjær; Annet
tr: Arazi kaykayı aks tipi: Kanallı; Çift kingpin (DKP); Matrix; Kaykay; Yaylı; Diğer